Mississippi, session 20251E, HB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer the sum of Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Victims of Human Trafficking and Commercial Sexual Exploitation Fund (Fund No. 3307800000) created in Section 97-3-54.11, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.